Hawaii statutes.
§490:2A-106 Limitation on power of parties
to consumer lease to choose applicable law and judicial forum. (a) If the
law chosen by the parties to a consumer lease is that of a jurisdiction other
than a jurisdiction in which the lessee resides at the time the lease agreement
becomes enforceable or within thirty days thereafter or in which the goods are
to be used, the choice is not enforceable.

(b) If the judicial forum chosen by the
parties to a consumer lease is a forum that would not otherwise have jurisdiction
over the lessee, the choice is not enforceable. [L 1991, c 40, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next